Delaware, session 153, SB127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE (Two-thirds of all members elected to each house thereof concurring therein): Section 1. Amend Section 11 of the Charter of the City of New Castle by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Section 11. Municipal Power (ab) To impose and collect a tax of no more than five percent (5%) on the gross rents within the boundaries of the City of New Castle. This tax may not apply to rental properties that are directly subsidized via Federal, State, or City of New Castle rental assistance funding.